Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2151
Default in payment of installments subsequent to decree; order of sale.

If, in the case mentioned in section 25-2150, there shall be any default subsequent to such decree in the payment of any portion or installment of the principal, or any interest due upon such mortgage, the court may, upon the complaint of the complainant, by a further order, founded upon such first decree, direct a sale of so much of the mortgaged premises to be made, under such decree, as will be sufficient to satisfy the amount so due, with the costs of such complaint and subsequent proceedings thereon, and the same proceedings may be had as often as a default shall happen.

R.S.1867, Code § 859, p. 544;

R.S.1913, § 8268;

C.S.1922, § 9221;

C.S.1929, § 20-2153;

R.S.1943, § 25-2151;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 39.